Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 191. Interests of Minors

§ 5611.
Interest of minors.

A petition on any matter affecting the interests of a minor under 33 V.S.A. chapter 51, 52, or 53; 15 V.S.A. chapter 9; or chapter 107 of this title shall be set down for hearing at the earliest possible time and shall take precedence over all matters except older matters of the same character.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 103.